Texas statutes.
PROPERTY CODE

TITLE 4. ACTIONS AND REMEDIES

CHAPTER 25. TRIAL OF RIGHT OF PROPERTY

Sec. 25.001. JURISDICTION. A trial of the right of property is an action that applies only to personal property. A trial of the right of property must be tried in a court with jurisdiction of the amount in controversy.

Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 3516, ch. 576, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1984.

Sec. 25.002. DAMAGES. If a claimant in a trial of the right of property does not establish a right to the property, the court shall adjudge damages against the obligors in the claimant's bond equal to 10 percent of the lesser of:

(1) the property's value; or

(2) the amount claimed under the writ levied against the property.

Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 3517, ch. 576, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1984.